Utah statutes.
19-8-105.   Eligibility and exceptions -- Grounds for application rejection
by executive director.
Subject to Section 19-8-106, any site is eligible for participation in the
voluntary cleanup program created under this chapter except:
(1)  a treatment, storage, or disposal facility regulated under 42 U.S.C. 6901
et seq.;
(2)  that portion of a site that is on the national priorities list; or
(3)  that portion of a site for which a state or federal enforcement action is
existing or pending against the applicant for remediation of the contaminants
described in the application.
